apertium-uzb.uzb_Cyrl.dix
	<pardef n="кўнг/ил__эга_бир">
	  <!-- бирлик, эгалик (шахси билан), келишик -->
      <e><p><l>лим</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимнинг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимни</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимга</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимда</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимдан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>линг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингнинг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингни</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингга</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингда</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингдан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ли</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лининг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лини</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лига</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лида</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лидан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимиз</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимизнинг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимизни</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимизга</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимизда</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лимиздан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш1"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингиз</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингизнинг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингизни</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингизга</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингизда</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>лингиздан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш2"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>иллари</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_бош"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илларининг</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_қар"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илларини</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_туш"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илларига</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_жўн"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илларида</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_ўп"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>илларидан</l><r><s n="от_бир"/><s n="от_эга"/><s n="ш3"/><s n="от_чиқ"/></r></p></e>
	  <!-- /бирлик, эгалик, келишик -->
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="кўнгил__эга_кўп">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="клуб__эга_кўп"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="кўнгил__эга">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="кўнгил__эга_бир"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="кўнгил__эга_кўп"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="кўнгил">
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="кўнгил__асос"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="кўнгил__эга"/></e>
    </pardef>
	<!-- pardefs: /от -->  
  </pardefs>
